Tennessee, session 114, HB0939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-1-506, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) The attorney general and reporter shall annually report by January 15 of
each year to the governor, speaker of the senate, and speaker of the house of
representatives the number of injunctions brought against persons pursuant to this
section in the preceding calendar year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0939
003015
- 1 -